Utah statutes.
20A-2-201.   Registering to vote at office of county clerk.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), the county clerk shall register to vote all persons who present themselves for registration at the county clerk's office during designated office hours if those persons, on the date of the election, will be legally eligible to vote in a voting precinct in the county in accordance with Section 20A-2-101.

(2)  If a registration form is submitted in person at the office of the county clerk during the period beginning on the date after the voter registration deadline and ending on the date that is 15 calendar days before the date of the election, the county clerk shall:

(a)  accept registration forms from all persons who present themselves for registration at the clerk's office during designated office hours if those persons, on the date of the election, will be legally qualified and entitled to vote in a voting precinct in the county; and

(b)  inform them that:

(i)  they will be registered to vote in the pending election; and

(ii)  for the pending election, they must vote on the day of the election and will not be eligible to vote using early voting under Chapter 3, Part 6, Early Voting, because they registered too late.

(3) If a registration form is submitted to the county clerk on the date of the election or during the 14 calendar days before an election, the county clerk shall:

(a)  accept registration forms from all persons who present themselves for registration at the clerk's office during designated office hours if those persons, on the date of the election, will be legally qualified and entitled to vote in a voting precinct in the county; and

(b)  inform them that they will be registered to vote but may not vote in the pending election because they registered too late.

